Utah statutes.
20A-7-606.   Submitting the referendum petition -- Certification of signatures by the county clerks -- Transfer to local clerk.

(1) (a)  The sponsors shall deliver each signed and verified referendum packet to the county clerk of the county in which the packet was circulated:

(i)  for county referenda, no later than 45 days after the passage of the local law;

(ii)  for municipal referenda, no later than 45 days after the passage of the local law; or

(iii)  for referenda held in relation to the adoption of an ordinance imposing a county option sales and use tax under Section 59-12-1102, no later than 100 days before the election that the referendum qualifies for under Subsection 20A-7-609(2)(c).

(b)  A sponsor may not submit a referendum packet after the deadline established in this Subsection (1).

(2) (a)  No later than 60 days after the local law passes, the county clerk shall:

(i)  check the names of all persons completing the verification on the last page of each referendum packet to determine whether those persons are Utah residents and are at least 18 years old; and

(ii)  submit the name of each of those persons who is not a Utah resident or who is not at least 18 years old to the attorney general and county attorney.

(b)  The county clerk may not certify a signature under Subsection (3) on a referendum packet that is not verified in accordance with Section 20A-7-605.

(3)  No later than 75 days after the local law passes, the county clerk shall:

(a)  determine whether each signer is a registered voter according to the requirements of Section 20A-7-606.3;

(b)  certify on the referendum petition whether each name is that of a registered voter; and

(c)  deliver all of the verified referendum packets to the local clerk.



Amended by Chapter 72, 2012 General Session

